Utah statutes.
78B-2-111.   Failure of action -- Right to commence new action.
(1)  If any action is timely filed and the judgment for the plaintiff is
reversed, or if the plaintiff fails in the action or upon a cause of action
otherwise than upon the merits, and the time limited either by law or contract
for commencing the action has expired, the plaintiff, or if he dies and the
cause of action survives, his representatives, may commence a new action
within one year after the reversal or failure.
(2)  On and after December 31, 2007, a new action may be commenced under this
section only once.
